California statutes. Civil Code
A waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1394)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, as prescribed by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.69.

The provisions of this title are severable. If any provision of this title or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1394)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, as prescribed by Stats. 2023, Ch. 579, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 25. Social Media Platforms Endangering Californians [3273.90. - 3273.91.]

3273.90.

As used in this title:

(a) “Clearly and conspicuously” or “clear and conspicuous” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17601 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) “Dark pattern” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 1798.140.

(c) “Personal information” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 1798.140 and any regulations promulgated thereunder. 

(d) “Social media platform” means a social media platform, as defined in Section 22675 of the Business
 and Professions Code, that generates more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) per year in gross revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 464, Sec. 2.   (AB 656)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3273.91.

(a) A social media platform shall provide a clear and conspicuous button that enables the user to delete their account that meets both of the following:

(1) Is clearly and conspicuously placed as an immediately visible option in the social media platform’s settings menu with the words “Delete Account.”

(2) The settings menu containing the button is accessible in the application, on a browser, or on any other format that a user can use to access the social media platform.

(b) (1) If a user clicks on the button required by subdivision (a), the social media platform shall, when the button is clicked, provide a user with the steps necessary to complete an account deletion request, which shall include deletion of the user’s personal information.

(2) If the social media platform seeks verification of the request to delete the account,
 that verification shall be done in a cost-effective and easy-to-use manner when the request in paragraph (1) is submitted through preestablished two-factor authentication, email, text message, telephone call, or message.

(c) A social media platform shall not obstruct or interfere with a user’s ability to delete their account, including, but not limited to, by using dark patterns.

(d) A request submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall constitute a request to delete the user’s personal information pursuant to Section 1798.105 and shall be processed in accordance with the requirements of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100)).

(e) A user login to an account for which a request under subdivision (b) has been submitted shall not, by itself, revoke that request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 464, Sec. 2.   (AB 656)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. GENERAL PROVISIONS [3274. - 9566.]



PART 1. RELIEF [3274. - 3428.]



  TITLE 1. RELIEF IN GENERAL [3274. - 3275.]

3274.

As a general rule, compensation is the relief or remedy provided by the law of this State for the violation of private rights, and the means of securing their observance; and specific and preventive relief may be given in no other cases than those specified in this Part of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3275.

Whenever, by the terms of an obligation, a party thereto incurs a forfeiture, or a loss in the nature of a forfeiture, by reason of his failure to comply with its provisions, he may be relieved therefrom, upon making full compensation to the other party, except in case of a grossly negligent, willful, or fraudulent breach of duty.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. COMPENSATORY RELIEF [3281. - 3361.]



  CHAPTER 1. Damages in General [3281. - 3296.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Principles [3281. - 3283.]

3281.

Every person who suffers detriment from the unlawful act or omission of another, may recover from the person in fault a compensation therefor in money, which is called damages.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3282.

Detriment is a loss or harm suffered in person or property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3283.

Damages may be awarded, in a judicial proceeding, for detriment resulting after the commencement thereof, or certain to result in the future.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Interest as Damages [3287. - 3291.]

3287.

(a) A person who is entitled to recover damages certain, or capable of being made certain by calculation, and the right to recover which is vested in the person upon a particular day, is entitled also to recover interest thereon from that day, except when the debtor is prevented by law, or by the act of the creditor from paying the debt. This section is applicable to recovery of damages and interest
 from any debtor, including the state or any county, city, city and county, municipal corporation, public district, public agency, or any political subdivision of the state.

(b) Every person who is entitled under any judgment to receive damages based upon a cause of action in contract where the claim was unliquidated, may also recover interest thereon from a date prior to the entry of judgment as the court may, in its discretion, fix, but in no event earlier than the date the action was filed.

(c) Unless another statute provides a different interest rate, in a tax or fee claim against a public entity that results in a judgment against the public entity, interest shall accrue at a rate equal to the weekly average one year constant maturity United States Treasury yield, but shall not exceed 7 percent per annum. That rate shall control until the judgment becomes enforceable under
 Section 965.5 or 970.1 of the Government Code, at which time interest shall accrue at an annual rate equal to the weekly average one year constant maturity United States Treasury yield at the time of the judgment plus 2 percent, but shall not exceed 7 percent per annum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (AB 748)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3288.

In an action for the breach of an obligation not arising from contract, and in every case of oppression, fraud, or malice, interest may be given, in the discretion of the jury.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3289.

(a) Any legal rate of interest stipulated by a contract remains chargeable after a breach thereof, as before, until the contract is superseded by a verdict or other new obligation.

(b) If a contract entered into after January 1, 1986, does not stipulate a legal rate of interest, the obligation shall bear interest at a rate of 10 percent per annum after a breach.

For the purposes of this subdivision, the term contract shall not include a note secured by a deed of trust on real
 property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   Effective June 23, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3289.5.

For purposes of Section 3289, the rate of the contracted finance charge shall be the legal rate of interest stipulated by a retail installment contract subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1801) of Title 2 of Part 4 of Division 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3290.

Accepting payment of the whole principal, as such, waives all claim to interest.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3291.

In any action brought to recover damages for personal injury sustained by any person resulting from or occasioned by the tort of any other person, corporation, association, or partnership, whether by negligence or by willful intent of the other person, corporation, association, or partnership, and whether the injury was fatal or otherwise, it is lawful for the plaintiff in the complaint to claim interest on the damages alleged as provided in this section.

If the plaintiff makes an offer pursuant to Section 998 of the Code of Civil Procedure which the defendant does not accept prior to trial or within 30 days,
 whichever occurs first, and the plaintiff obtains a more favorable judgment, the judgment shall bear interest at the legal rate of 10 percent per annum calculated from the date of the plaintiff’s first offer pursuant to Section 998 of the Code of Civil Procedure which is exceeded by the judgment, and interest shall accrue until the satisfaction of judgment.

This section shall not apply to a public entity, or to a public employee for an act or omission within the scope of employment, and neither the public entity nor the public employee shall be liable, directly or indirectly, to any person for any interest imposed by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemplary Damages [3294. - 3296.]

3294.

(a) In an action for the breach of an obligation not arising from contract, where it is proven by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant has been guilty of oppression, fraud, or malice, the plaintiff, in addition to the actual damages, may recover damages for the sake of example and by way of punishing the defendant.

(b) An employer shall not be liable for damages pursuant to subdivision (a), based upon acts of an employee of the employer, unless the employer had
 advance knowledge of the unfitness of the employee and employed him or her with a conscious disregard of the rights or safety of others or authorized or ratified the wrongful conduct for which the damages are awarded or was personally guilty of oppression, fraud, or malice. With respect to a corporate employer, the advance knowledge and conscious disregard, authorization, ratification or act of oppression, fraud, or malice must be on the part of an officer, director, or managing agent of the corporation.

(c) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Malice” means conduct which is intended by the defendant to cause injury to the plaintiff or despicable conduct which is carried on by the defendant with a willful and conscious disregard of the rights or safety of others.

(2) “Oppression” means
 despicable conduct that subjects a person to cruel and unjust hardship in conscious disregard of that person’s rights.

(3) “Fraud” means an intentional misrepresentation, deceit, or concealment of a material fact known to the defendant with the intention on the part of the defendant of thereby depriving a person of property or legal rights or otherwise causing injury.

(d) Damages may be recovered pursuant to this section in an action pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 377.10) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure based upon a death which resulted from a homicide for which the defendant has been convicted of a felony, whether or not the decedent died instantly or survived the fatal injury for some period of time. The procedures for joinder and consolidation contained in Section 377.62 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to prevent multiple
 recoveries of punitive or exemplary damages based upon the same wrongful act.

(e) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 1498 of the Statutes of 1987 apply to all actions in which the initial trial has not commenced prior to January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3295.

(a) The court may, for good cause, grant any defendant a protective order requiring the plaintiff to produce evidence of a prima facie case of liability for damages pursuant to Section 3294, prior to the introduction of evidence of:

(1) The profits the defendant has gained by virtue of the wrongful course of conduct of the nature and type shown by the evidence.

(2) The financial condition of the defendant.

(b) Nothing in this section
 shall prohibit the introduction of prima facie evidence to establish a case for damages pursuant to Section 3294.

(c) No pretrial discovery by the plaintiff shall be permitted with respect to the evidence referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) unless the court enters an order permitting such discovery pursuant to this subdivision. However, the plaintiff may subpoena documents or witnesses to be available at the trial for the purpose of establishing the profits or financial condition referred to in subdivision (a), and the defendant may be required to identify documents in the defendant’s possession which are relevant and admissible for that purpose and the witnesses employed by or related to the defendant who would be most competent to testify to those facts. Upon motion by the plaintiff supported by appropriate affidavits and after a hearing, if the court deems a hearing to be necessary, the court may at any time enter an
 order permitting the discovery otherwise prohibited by this subdivision if the court finds, on the basis of the supporting and opposing affidavits presented, that the plaintiff has established that there is a substantial probability that the plaintiff will prevail on the claim pursuant to Section 3294. Such order shall not be considered to be a determination on the merits of the claim or any defense thereto and shall not be given in evidence or referred to at the trial.

(d) The court shall, on application of any defendant, preclude the admission of evidence of that defendant’s profits or financial condition until after the trier of fact returns a verdict for plaintiff awarding actual damages and finds that a defendant is guilty of malice, oppression, or fraud in accordance with Section 3294. Evidence of profit and financial condition shall be admissible only as to the defendant or defendants found to be liable to the plaintiff and to be guilty
 of malice, oppression, or fraud. Evidence of profit and financial condition shall be presented to the same trier of fact that found for the plaintiff and found one or more defendants guilty of malice, oppression, or fraud.

(e) No claim for exemplary damages shall state an amount or amounts.

(f) The amendments to this section made by Senate Bill No. 241 of the 1987–88 Regular Session apply to all actions in which the initial trial has not commenced prior to January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1498, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

3296.

(a) Whenever a judgment for punitive damages is entered against an insurer or health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, the plaintiff in the action shall, within 10 days of entry of judgment, provide all of the following to the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance or the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, whichever commissioner has regulatory jurisdiction over the insurer or health care service plan:

(1) A copy of the judgment.

(2) A brief recitation of the facts of the case.

(3) Copies of relevant pleadings, as determined by the plaintiff.

(b) The willful failure to comply with this section may, at the discretion of the trial court, result in the imposition of sanctions against the plaintiff or his or her attorney.

(c) This section shall apply to all judgments entered on or after January 1, 1995.

(d) “Insurer,” for purposes of this section, means any person or entity transacting any of the classes of insurance described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Insurance
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Measure of Damages [[3300.] - 3361.]



  ARTICLE 1. Damages for Breach of Contract [[3300.] - 3322.]

[3300.]

Section Thirty-three Hundred. For the breach of an obligation arising from contract, the measure of damages, except where otherwise expressly provided by this Code, is the amount which will compensate the party aggrieved for all the detriment proximately caused thereby, or which, in the ordinary course of things, would be likely to result therefrom.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

No damages can be recovered for a breach of contract which are not clearly ascertainable in both their nature and origin.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

The detriment caused by the breach of an obligation to pay money only, is deemed to be the amount due by the terms of the obligation, with interest thereon.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.

The detriment caused by the breach of a covenant of “seizin,” of “right to convey,” of “warranty,” or of “quiet enjoyment,” in a grant of an estate in real property, is deemed to be:

1. The price paid to the grantor; or, if the breach is partial only, such proportion of the price as the value of the property affected by the breach bore at the time of the grant to the value of the whole property;

2. Interest thereon for the time during which the grantee derived no benefit from the property, not exceeding five years;

3. Any expenses properly incurred by the covenantee in defending his possession.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3305.

The detriment caused by the breach of a covenant against incumbrances in a grant of an estate in real property is deemed to be the amount which has been actually expended by the covenantee in extinguishing either the principal or interest thereof, not exceeding in the former case a proportion of the price paid to the grantor equivalent to the relative value at the time of the grant of the property affected by the breach, as compared with the whole, or, in the latter case, interest on a like amount.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3306.

The detriment caused by the breach of an agreement to convey an estate in real property, is deemed to be the price paid, and the expenses properly incurred in examining the title and preparing the necessary papers, the difference between the price agreed to be paid and the value of the estate agreed to be conveyed at the time of the breach, the expenses properly incurred in preparing to enter upon the land, consequential damages according to proof, and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3306a.

The minimum detriment caused by the breach of an agreement to execute and deliver a quitclaim deed to real property is deemed to be the expenses incurred by the promisee in quieting title to such property, and the expenses incidental to the entry upon such property. Such expenses which shall include reasonable attorneys’ fees shall be fixed by the court in the quiet title action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 661.)
-------------------------------------------

3307.

The detriment caused by the breach of an agreement to purchase an estate in real property is deemed to be the excess, if any, of the amount which would have been due to the seller under the contract over the value of the property to him or her, consequential damages according to proof, and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3308.

The parties to any lease of real or personal property may agree therein that if the lease shall be terminated by the lessor by reason of any breach thereof by the lessee, the lessor shall thereupon be entitled to recover from the lessee the worth at the time of the termination, of the excess, if any, of the amount of rent and charges equivalent to rent reserved in the lease for the balance of the stated term or any shorter period of time over the then reasonable rental value of the property for the same period.

The rights of the lessor under the agreement shall be cumulative to all other rights or remedies
 now or hereafter given to the lessor by law or by the terms of the lease; provided, however, that the election of the lessor to exercise the remedy hereinabove permitted shall be binding upon him or her and exclude recourse thereafter to any other remedy for rental or charges equivalent to rental or damages for breach of the covenant to pay the rent or charges accruing subsequent to the time of the termination. The parties to the lease may further agree therein that unless the remedy provided by this section is exercised by the lessor within a specified time the right thereto shall be barred.

This section does not apply to a lease of real property unless (a) the lease was executed before July 1, 1971, or (b) the terms of the lease were fixed by a lease, option, or other agreement executed before July 1, 1971.

This section does not apply to leases subject to Division 10 (commencing
 with Section 10101) of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1368, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1368.)
-------------------------------------------

3315.

The detriment caused by the breach of a carrier’s obligation to accept freight, messages, or passengers, is deemed to be the difference between the amount which he had a right to charge for the carriage and the amount which it would be necessary to pay for the same service when it ought to be performed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.

The detriment caused by the breach of a carrier’s obligation to deliver freight, where he has not converted it to his own use, is deemed to be the value thereof at the place and on the day at which it should have been delivered, deducting the freightage to which he would have been entitled if he had completed the delivery.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3317.

The detriment caused by a carrier’s delay in the delivery of freight, is deemed to be the depreciation in the intrinsic value of the freight during the delay, and also the depreciation, if any, in the market value thereof, otherwise than by reason of a depreciation in its intrinsic value, at the place where it ought to have been delivered, and between the day at which it ought to have been delivered, and the day of its actual delivery.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3318.

The detriment caused by the breach of a warranty of an agent’s authority, is deemed to be the amount which could have been recovered and collected from his principal if the warranty had been complied with, and the reasonable expenses of legal proceedings taken, in good faith, to enforce the act of the agent against his principal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3319.

(a) In each written contract for private works of improvement entered into on or after January 1, 1996, the contracting party and the design professional may agree to contractual provisions that include a late payment penalty, in lieu of any interest otherwise due. The terms of the late payment penalty shall be specifically set forth in the written contract.

(b) The penalty authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be separate from, and in addition to, the design professionals liens provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8300) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4, mechanics liens provided by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4, and stop payment notices provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8500) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4.

(c) None of the rights or obligations created or permitted by this section between design professionals and contracting parties shall apply to construction loan funds held by a lender pursuant to a construction loan agreement.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Contracting party” means any
 person or entity entering into a written contract with a design professional for professional design services for a private work of improvement.

(2) “Design professional” means a person licensed as an architect pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, registered as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed as a land surveyor pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 17.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

3320.

(a) In each contract for public works of improvement, entered into on or after January 1, 1996, the public agency shall pay to the prime design professional any progress payment within 30 days of receipt of a written demand for payment in accordance with the contract, and the final retention payment within 45 days of receipt of a written demand for payment in accordance
 with the contract. If the public agency disputes in good faith any portion of the amount due, it may withhold from the payment an amount not to exceed 150 percent of the disputed amount. The disputed amount withheld is not subject to any penalty authorized by this section.

(b) If any amount is wrongfully withheld or is not timely paid in violation of this section, the prime design professional shall be entitled to a penalty of 112 percent for the improperly withheld amount, in lieu of any interest otherwise due, per month for every month that payment is not made. In any action for the collection of amounts withheld in violation of this section, the prevailing party is entitled to his or her reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(c) The penalty described in subdivision (b) is
 separate from, and in addition to, the design professionals liens provided by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8300) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4, mechanics liens provided by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4, and stop payment notices on public works provided by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9350) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4.

(d) This section does not apply to state agency contracts subject to Section 927.6 of the Government Code.

(e) None of the rights or obligations created by this section between prime design professionals and public agencies apply to construction loan funds held by a lender pursuant to a construction loan agreement.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Public agency”
 means the state, any county, any city, any city and county, any district, any public authority, any public agency, any municipal corporation, or other political subdivision or political corporation of the state.

(2) “Design professional” means a person licensed as an architect pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, registered as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed as a land surveyor pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Prime design professional” means a design professional with a written contract directly with the public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 18.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

3321.

(a) In each contract for public works of improvement, a prime design professional shall pay to each subconsultant design professional the amount due him or her from the payment received, not later than 15 days after receipt of each progress payment or final retention payment. If the prime design professional disputes in good faith any portion of the amount due, he or she
 may withhold from the payment an amount not to exceed 150 percent of the disputed amount. The disputed amount withheld shall not be subject to any penalty authorized by this section.

(b) If any amount is wrongfully withheld or is not timely paid in violation of this section, the subconsultant design professional shall be entitled to a penalty of 112 percent of the improperly withheld amount, in lieu of any interest otherwise due, per month, for each month that payment is not made. In any action for the collection of amounts withheld in violation of this section, the prevailing party shall be entitled to his or her reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(c) The penalty described in subdivision (b) shall be separate from, and in addition to, the design professionals liens provided by
 Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8300) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4, mechanics liens provided by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4, and stop payment notices on public works provided by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9350) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4.

(d) None of the rights or obligations created by this section between prime design professionals and subconsultant design professionals shall apply to construction loan funds held by a lender pursuant to a construction loan agreement.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Public agency” means the state, any county, any city, any city and county, any district, any public authority, any public agency, any municipal corporation, or other political subdivision or political corporation of the state.

(2) “Design professional” means a person licensed as an architect pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, registered as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed as a land surveyor pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Prime design professional” means a design professional having a written contract directly with the public agency.

(4) “Subconsultant design professional” means a design professional having a written contract with a prime design professional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 19.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

3322.

(a) (1) A broker of construction trucking services shall pay all transportation charges submitted by a motor carrier of property in dump truck equipment by the 25th day following the last day of the calendar month in which the transportation was performed, if the charges, including all necessary documentation, are submitted by the fifth day following the last day of the calendar month in which the transportation was performed. If there is a good faith dispute over a portion of the charges claimed, the broker may
 withhold payment of an amount not to exceed 150 percent of the estimated cost of the disputed amount.

(2) A broker who violates paragraph (1) shall pay to the motor carrier of property in dump truck equipment a penalty of 2 percent per month on the improperly withheld amount. 

(3) In an action for the collection of moneys not paid in accordance with paragraph (1), the prevailing party shall be entitled to his or her attorney’s fees and costs.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the following definitions apply:

(1) A “broker of construction trucking services” means any person, excluding a licensed contractor, that, as a principal or agent, arranges for transportation services to be provided by an independent contractor motor carrier of property in dump
 truck equipment and who is responsible for paying the transportation charges of the motor carrier.

(2) A “motor carrier of property in dump truck equipment” means a motor carrier of property permitted by the Department of Motor Vehicles that hauls any type of construction commodity or material in dump truck equipment.

(c) Subdivision (a) only applies if a motor carrier of property is in compliance with Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 36000) of the Vehicle Code at the time the dump truck transportation work is performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Damages for Wrongs [3333. - 3343.7.]

3333.

For the breach of an obligation not arising from contract, the measure of damages, except where otherwise expressly provided by this Code, is the amount which will compensate for all the detriment proximately caused thereby, whether it could have been anticipated or not.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3333.1.

(a) In the event the defendant so elects, in an action for personal injury against a health care provider based upon professional negligence, he may introduce evidence of any amount payable as a benefit to the plaintiff as a result of the personal injury pursuant to the United States Social Security Act, any state or federal income disability or worker’s compensation act, any health, sickness or income-disability insurance, accident insurance that provides health benefits or income-disability coverage, and any contract or agreement of any group, organization, partnership, or corporation to provide, pay for, or reimburse the cost of medical,
 hospital, dental, or other health care services. Where the defendant elects to introduce such evidence, the plaintiff may introduce evidence of any amount which the plaintiff has paid or contributed to secure his right to any insurance benefits concerning which the defendant has introduced evidence.

(b) No source of collateral benefits introduced pursuant to subdivision (a) shall recover any amount against the plaintiff nor shall it be subrogated to the rights of the plaintiff against a defendant.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Health care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5
 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code; and any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility, licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code. “Health care provider” includes the legal representatives of a health care provider;

(2) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission to act by a health care provider in the rendering of professional services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal injury or wrongful death, provided that such services are within the scope of services for which the provider is licensed and which are not within any restriction imposed by the licensing agency or licensed hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

3333.2.

(a) In any action for injury against a health care provider or health care institution based on professional negligence, the injured plaintiff shall be entitled to recover noneconomic losses to compensate for pain, suffering, inconvenience, physical impairment, disfigurement and other nonpecuniary damage, subject to the limitations in this section.

(b) In any action for injury that does not involve wrongful death against one or more health care providers or health care institutions based on professional negligence, the following limitations shall apply:

(1) Civil liability for damages for noneconomic losses against one or more health care providers, collectively, shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), regardless of the number of health care providers, which does not include any unaffiliated health care providers that are responsible for noneconomic losses pursuant to paragraph (3).

(2) Civil liability for damages for noneconomic losses against one or more health care institutions, collectively, shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), regardless of the number of health care institutions, which does not include
 any unaffiliated health care institutions that are responsible for noneconomic losses pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) Civil liability for damages for noneconomic losses against one or more health care providers or health care institutions that are unaffiliated with a defendant described in paragraph (1) or (2) based on acts of professional negligence separate and independent from the acts of professional negligence of a defendant described in paragraph (1) or (2) and that occurred at, or in relation to medical transport to, a health care institution unaffiliated with a health care institution described in paragraph (2), collectively, shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), regardless of the number of defendants described in this paragraph, which does not include any unaffiliated health care providers or unaffiliated health care institutions that are responsible for noneconomic losses pursuant to paragraph (1) or
 (2).

(c) In any action for wrongful death against one or more health care providers or health care institutions based on professional negligence, the following limitations shall apply:

(1) Civil liability for damages for noneconomic losses against one or more health care providers, collectively, shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), regardless of the number of health care providers, which does not include any unaffiliated health care providers that are responsible for noneconomic losses pursuant to paragraph (3).

(2) Civil liability for damages for noneconomic losses against one or more health care institutions, collectively, shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), regardless of the number of health care institutions, which does not include any unaffiliated health care
 institutions that are responsible for noneconomic losses pursuant to paragraph (3).
